Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

64 Am. Jur. 2d Public Utilities § 1 et seq.

Right-of-way for electric line, correlative rights of dominant and servient owners in, 6 ALR2d 205.

Right of public utility to discontinue line or branch on ground that it is unprofitable, 10 ALR2d 1121.

Special requirements of consumer as giving rise to implied contract by public utility to furnish particular amount of electricity, gas, or water, 13 ALR2d 1233.

Validity of public utility anti-strike laws and regulations, 22 ALR2d 894.

Amount of compensation of attorney for services as to public utility holding company reorganization in absence of contract or statute fixing amount, 56 ALR2d 13, 57 ALR3d 475.

Liability of public utility to abutting owner for destruction or injury of trees in or near highway or street, 64 ALR2d 866.

Compensation or damages for condemning a public utility plant, 68 ALR2d 392.

Validity of contract between public utilities other than carriers, dividing territory and customers, 70 ALR2d 1326.

Constitutionality of state legislation to reimburse public utilities for cost of relocating their facilities because of highway construction, conditioned upon federal reimbursement of state under terms of Federal-Aid Highway Act [23 U.S.C. § 123], 75 ALR2d 419.

Electric generating plant or transformer station as nuisance, 4 ALR3d 902.

Liability of owner or operator of premises for injury to meter reader or similar employee of public service corporation coming to premises in course of duties, 28 ALR3d 1344.

Propriety of injunctive relief against diversion of water by municipal corporation or public utility, 42 ALR3d 426.

Electricity, gas, or water furnished by public utility as “goods” within provisions of Uniform Commercial Code, Article 2 on Sales, 48 ALR3d 1060.

Racial or religious discrimination in furnishing of public utilities, services or facilities, 53 ALR3d 1027.

Charitable contributions by public utility as part of operating expense, 59 ALR3d 941.

Validity of zoning ordinance deferring residential development until establishment of public services in area, 63 ALR3d 1184.

Liability of power company for injury or death resulting from contact of radio or television antenna with electrical line, 82 ALR3d 113.

Applicability of rule of strict liability to injury from electrical current escaping from powerline, 82 ALR3d 218; 60 ALR4th 732.

Liability of telephone company for injury resulting from condition or location of telephone booth, 17 ALR4th 1308.

Carrier's “public duty” exception to absolute or strict liability arising out of carriage of hazardous substances, 31 ALR4th 658.

Liability of land carrier to passenger who becomes victim of third party's assault on or about carrier's vehicle or premises, 34 ALR4th 1054.

State civil actions by subscription television business for use, or providing technical means of use, of transmissions by nonsubscribers, 46 ALR4th 811.

Placement, maintenance or design of standing utility pole as affecting private utility's liability for personal injury resulting from vehicle's collision with pole within or beside highway, 51 ALR4th 602.

17A C.J.S Contracts § 222.